Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Community Development Authority

Cross references. —

As to the state banking commissioner, see §

13-1-601

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d Housing Laws and Urban Redevelopment § 1 et seq.

§ 9-7-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Community Development Authority Act”.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-826; W.S. 1977, §

9-18-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to municipal housing projects, see §

15-10-101

et seq.

For Wyoming Relocation Assistance Act of 1973, see §

16-7-101

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used to in this section, see § 9-7-103(a)(xvi).

Wyoming Joint Powers Act, §§

16-1-102

through

16-1-109

, is a companion act to this chapter.

Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

State Highway Commission Loan Act, §

24-11-101

, is a related act to this chapter.

Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 9-7-102.
Legislative findings.

It is declared that:

There is in this state by reason of the location and expansion of mineral extractive industries and other industrial developments, a critical shortage of adequate housing and a lack of funds of private mortgage lending institutions of the state which are available to finance new and existing housing at reasonable rates;

It is in the public interest of the citizens of this state to promote the economic welfare of the state and its residents by increasing employment, stimulating economic activity, augmenting sources of tax revenue, fostering economic stability, furthering health care and improving the balance of the state’s economy;

This act constitutes a valid public purpose, of primary benefit to all citizens of the state of Wyoming.

In purchasing loans from or making loans to mortgage lenders, the authority shall give preference to mortgage lenders authorized to do business within the state.

This act and the powers of the authority shall be liberally construed to enable the authority to carry out its purposes.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-827; W.S. 1977, §

9-18-102

; Laws 1978, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, § 1; 1979, ch. 103, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1984, ch. 43, § 2; 2001, ch. 47, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

Chapter clearly does not authorize borrowing for reasons other than for public purposes.

Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Coping with Expansion: The State as Local Government Financier,” see 10 Land & Water L. Rev. 577 (1975).

For article, “Accommodation or Preemption? State and Federal Control of Private Coal Lands in Wyoming,” see 12 Land & Water L. Rev. 73 (1977).

§ 9-7-103.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Authority” means the Wyoming community development authority;

“Board” means the board of directors of the Wyoming community development authority;

“Bonds” means notes, warrants, bonds, temporary bonds and anticipation notes issued by the authority pursuant to this act;

“Economic development project” means any land, building or other improvement and all real and personal property including machinery and equipment suitable for:

Manufacturing, processing or assembling agricultural or manufactured products;

Storing, warehousing, distributing or selling agricultural, mining or industrial products or any related processes including research and development;

Health care including any facility used or occupied by any person for providing services in any home for the elderly, any nursing home, rest home or facility providing living space for the developmentally disabled or any person sixty (60) years of age or older;

Airports, parking facilities or storage or training facilities directly related to any other facility specified under this paragraph;

Industrial park facilities;

Sewage or solid waste disposal facilities;

Facilities furnishing electric energy, gas or water;

Any other project which can be financed by a municipality or county pursuant to the definition of project under W.S. 15-1-701(a)(ii);

Secondary, tertiary and enhanced mineral recovery projects.

“Financial institution” means any bank or savings and loan association authorized to do business within this state;

“Home improvement loan” means a loan of money for the essential alteration, repair or improvement of an existing home;

“Insurance fund” means the fund created under W.S.

9-7-123

;

“Care facility” means any governmental or nonprofit hospital and may include any land, building, other improvements or equipment and all real and personal, tangible or intangible, property in connection therewith, or any interest therein or combination thereof;

“Mortgage lender” means a bank, mortgage banking company, trust company, savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, national banking association, federal savings and loan association or federal credit union maintaining an office in this state and authorized to make mortgage loans in this state or an insurance company authorized to do business in this state;

“Project” means a care facility or a specific residential housing project including any land, building, other improvements or equipment and all real and personal, tangible or intangible, property in connection therewith, or any interest therein or combination thereof, or any portion of a project;

“Project cost” means the sum total of costs which the authority deems necessary for financing and carrying out a project;

“Real property” means lands, buildings, improvements, fixtures, structures and interests in land, including water rights and all appurtenances to the land;

“Rehabilitation” means the repair, reconstruction, remodeling or improvement of existing housing;

“State” means the state of Wyoming;

“State agency” means any office or instrumentality of the state;

“This act” means W.S.

9-7-101

through

9-7-125

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-828; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-103; Laws 1978, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 103, § 1; 1980, ch. 14, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 135, § 1; 1984, ch. 43, § 2; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2001, ch. 47, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to chartering of banks, see §

13-2-201

et seq.

As to banks authorized to make real estate loans, see §

13-3-401

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(iv)(I) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978); Foster's Inc. v. City of Laramie, 718 P.2d 868,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 541

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 9-7-104.
Community development authority; creation; composition; compensation; termination; meetings; surety bonds; personal liability; fiscal control.

This act creates the Wyoming community development authority. The authority is a body corporate operating as a state instrumentality operated solely for the public benefit. Its membership consists of ten (10) directors, seven (7) of whom are appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the appointed directors shall be from the same political party. Directors shall serve for staggered terms of four (4) years each. No appointed director shall serve more than two (2) successive four (4) year terms. A director’s term may be terminated by the governor under the same procedure and in the same manner as provided by W.S. 9-1-202(a) or a majority vote of the senate. Directors shall continue in office until their successors are appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint a successor to serve in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

. The board of directors shall select one (1) of its members to act as chairman of the board of directors and one (1) member to act as treasurer. The board of directors appoints the executive director of the authority, who serves as the executive secretary to the board and is the chief executive officer of the authority. The executive director serves at the pleasure of the board. The executive director shall be an ex officio member of the board but may not vote. The governor and the state treasurer are members of the board and may vote.

The directors, other than the executive director, the governor and the state treasurer, shall receive compensation for each day or part thereof in which they are engaged in performance of their official duties at the same rate as state legislators and shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties. The board shall fix the salary of the executive director. Subject to the approval of the directors, and pursuant to W.S.

9-7-118

the executive director shall determine the terms of employment, tenure, duties, working conditions, promotion and termination of all other employees which the executive director determines are necessary to carry out the purposes and functions of the authority. Employees of the authority may be covered by and subject to the provisions of the Wyoming Retirement Act [article 4 of chapter 3 of this title], the State Employees and Officials Group Insurance Act and the Wyoming Deferred Compensation Act.

The authority shall exist perpetually or until terminated by law. No termination of the authority shall take effect so long as the authority has bonds and other obligations outstanding, unless adequate provision has been made for the payment thereof. Upon termination of the authority, all its rights and properties shall pass to and be vested in the state.

The board shall determine the date, time, place and method of notice for all regular meetings of the board. A majority of the voting directors of the authority constitutes a quorum for the transaction of any business or the exercise of any power or function of the authority. All matters shall be decided by a majority vote of the voting members of the board. Minutes of board meetings shall be kept, maintained and open to members of the public. Notice of meetings shall be given to the public prior to the meetings and meetings shall be open to the public in accordance with W.S.

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

. In emergency circumstances, as unanimously determined by the board members, the board may take action by conference telephone or similar communications equipment whereby all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same time. The conversation shall be recorded, immediately transcribed as minutes of the board, and notice given of their availability for public review. The finding by the board that an emergency exists shall be binding and conclusive unless clearly erroneous.

The authority shall execute and maintain at its expense a blanket surety bond covering each director, the executive director and the employees or other officers of the authority in the penal sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00).

Neither the directors, the executive director, the employees of the authority nor any other person executing bonds shall be subject to any personal liability by reason of their issuance.

Notwithstanding any other provision, the directors, the executive director and the employees of the authority shall receive approval in advance from the governor prior to traveling out of state on official business. Except as specifically provided in this act, the provisions of W.S.

9-2-1001

.1 through

9-2-1014

.2 and

9-2-3201

through

9-2-3208

do not apply to the authority.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-829; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-104; Laws 1978, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, § 1; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; ch. 103, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 135, § 1; 1988, ch. 87, § 2; 1998, ch. 34, § 1; 2005, ch. 194, § 2; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to municipal housing authority, see §

15-10-116

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “16-4-408” for “16-4-407” in (d).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%)” for “four (4)” in the fourth sentence of (a).

The 2021 amendment,

in (g), substituted "9-2-1001.1" for "9-2-1001" and "9-2-1014.2 and 9 2 3201 through

9-2-3208

" for "9-2-1024."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 119 § 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Wyoming Deferred Compensation Act. —

The Wyoming Deferred Compensation Act, referred in the last sentence in subsection (b), apparently means article 5 of chapter 3 of this title.

Wyoming Retirement Act. —

See §

9-3-401

et seq.

State Employers and Officers Group Insurance Act. —

See §

9-3-201

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

Authority held entity having characteristics of state agency. —

In the absence of the legislature's expressed intent to the contrary prior to the 1978 amendment, the supreme court held that the legislature created an entity, having all the characteristics of a state agency. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Quoted

in

Foster's Inc. v. City of Laramie, 718 P.2d 868,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 541

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Wyoming Community Dev. Auth. v. Baker, 801 F.2d 364, 1986 U.S. App. LEXIS 29819 (10th Cir. 1986).

§ 9-7-105.
Community development authority; general powers and duties.

For the purposes of this act, the authority may:

Sue and be sued and procure necessary liability insurance;

Have a seal;

Make and execute contracts and other instruments, including financial contracts and instruments which the authority determines are reasonable and advisable to carry out the purposes and programs of the authority;

Adopt rules and regulations for its organization, for special meetings of the board, for internal management and for its loans, projects, economic development projects, operations, properties and facilities, including regulations governing the purchase, sale, rental, use, occupancy, maintenance, repair and alteration of housing projects. The rules and regulations shall be filed pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [16-3-101 through

16-3-115

];

Acquire or contract to acquire by grant, purchase, option or otherwise, real, personal or mixed property or any interest in property;

Own, hold, clear, improve and rehabilitate, and sell, assign, exchange, transfer, convey, lease, mortgage or otherwise dispose of, or encumber the same;

Sell, lease, assign, transfer, convey, exchange, mortgage or otherwise dispose of or encumber any project or economic development project, and in the case of the sale of any project or economic development project, accept a purchase money mortgage in connection with the sale, and lease, repurchase or otherwise acquire and hold any project or economic development project which the authority has sold, leased or otherwise conveyed, transferred or disposed of;

Grant options to purchase any project or economic development project or to renew any leases entered into by it in connection with any of its projects or economic development projects, on terms and conditions it considers advisable;

Prepare plans, specifications, designs and cost estimates for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, alteration or repair of any project or economic development project, and modify the plans, specifications, designs or estimates;

Manage any project or economic development project, whether owned or leased by the authority, and enter into agreements for managing any project or economic development project;

Provide advisory, consultative or educational services, technical assistance and advice to any person in order to carry out the purposes of the authority;

Borrow money and issue its negotiable bonds and provide for the rights of the holders thereof;

Mortgage or pledge any or all of its revenue, income, projects or economic development projects whether owned or later acquired, and assign or pledge the leases on any portion of the projects or economic development projects as security for the payment of the principal and interest on any bonds issued and any agreements made in connection therewith;

Deposit or invest any funds of the authority as provided in W.S.

9-7-116

;

Procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets and operations in amounts and from insurers it deems desirable including, without limitation, participating with the federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof or any private insurer in any insurance or guaranty program;

Engage the services of consultants on a contract basis for rendering professional, financial and technical assistance and advice;

Contract for and accept any gifts or grants or loans of funds or property or financial or other aid in any form from the federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from any other source and pass through or otherwise comply, subject to the provisions of this act, with the terms and conditions thereof;

Purchase loans from mortgage lenders, including construction loans or advances, or participations therein, subject to W.S.

9-7-106

, and sell or otherwise dispose of the loans;

Make loans to mortgage lenders under terms and conditions requiring the proceeds to be used by the mortgage lenders to make mortgages on residential real property, subject to W.S.

9-7-106

;

Enter into loan servicing agreements with any mortgage lender in this state at reasonable fees;

Consent to the modification of the terms of any mortgage, loan or contract to which the authority is a party, subject to any contract with bondholders;

Make loans, including loans to mortgage lenders to enable the lenders to make loans, to finance projects, including construction loans and advances, under terms and conditions, and with security therefore, as the authority deems appropriate. The authority shall not make any loan, other than loans to mortgage lenders, which is a first lien loan to a homeowner with respect to single family residential property.

The authority shall:

Cooperate with the director of the state department of audit and its own auditors to develop and adopt guidelines relative to the proper handling and accounting for receipts and disbursements of the authority and other financial and administrative policies which shall generally correspond to normal business practices required of financial institutions;

Provide by rule and regulation that any person assuming a mortgage loan under this chapter shall qualify under existing authority rules and regulations to the extent that rules for qualifying are not in conflict with federal programs.

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 87, § 3.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-830; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-105; Laws 1978, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 103, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 14, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1984, ch. 43, § 2; 1988, ch. 87, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 105, § 1; 2001, ch. 47, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

Plan to purchase secured and insured loans not unconstitutional.—

The plan of the Wyoming community development authority, to purchase secured and insured loans is not violative of the Wyoming constitution. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Speaking only to the mortgage purchase and loans to lenders provisions, as long as no debt in the state is created, there is no lending of the credit of the state in violation of art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const.Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978) (decided prior to 1978 amendment of §

9-7-104

).

Supplementing this section is §

9-7-106

,

which to a considerable extent lays down detailed guidelines and restrictions upon the purchase of mortgages and loans to lenders.
Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Community development authority is a statewide governmental instrumentality, not a political subdivision.

It is designed, though having some unconstitutional features, to meet the economic impact upon the entire state and its people. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978) (decided prior to 1978 amendment of §

9-7-104

).

But the authority has no power to tax.

There is nothing in this chapter permitting the authority to move into a community and perform any function against the will of the people there residing. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Suability, and liability, for torts, of public housing authority, 61 ALR2d 1246.

§ 9-7-106.
Community development authority; additional powers; purchase of mortgages; loans to lenders; funds appropriated for low interest mortgages.

In addition to the other powers granted in this act, the authority:

May purchase from mortgage lenders or make commitments to purchase, or take assignments from mortgage lenders of notes and mortgages evidencing loans for the purchase, construction or rehabilitation of residential real property in the state. If the notes and mortgages are financed with bond proceeds, the notes and mortgages shall be insured or guaranteed in whole or in part by governmental or private mortgage insurers, including the fund created by W.S.

9-7-123

, or otherwise secured as provided in the resolution or trust indenture authorizing bonds of the authority;

May make loans to mortgage lenders which are general obligations of the respective lenders and may establish maturity dates, repayment schedules, provisions for prepayment, the nature, bond, note or other certificate of indebtedness and other provisions consistent with this section which the authority determines are necessary. The authority shall require as a condition of each loan to a mortgage lender that the mortgage lender, on or before a designated date shall have entered into written commitments to make, and shall proceed as promptly as practicable to make and disburse, new mortgages on residential real property in an aggregate principal amount equal to the amount of the loan;

Shall require that loans to mortgage lenders are additionally secured as to payment of both principal and interest by a pledge of and lien upon collateral security in the amounts the authority by resolution determines to be necessary to assure the payment of the loans and the interest thereon as they become due. Such collateral security shall be determined by the authority and may consist of those obligations described in W.S. 9-7-105(a)(xiv) or mortgages secured by first mortgage liens on residential real property in the state;

May, in connection with any mortgage loan or loan to a mortgage lender, foreclose on any property on which the authority holds a mortgage loan, or realize upon any collateral pledged as security, or commence any action to protect or enforce any right conferred upon it by any law, mortgage, contract or other agreement, and bid for and purchase such property or collateral at any foreclosure or at any other sale, or acquire or take possession of any such property or collateral. In the event of a proposed or existing foreclosure or sale of collateral the authority may complete, administer, pay the principal of and interest on any obligations in connection with the property, subordinate its interest to other financing, dispose of, and otherwise deal with the property in the manner that may be necessary or desirable to protect the interest of the authority therein;

Shall adopt, modify or repeal rules and regulations governing the making of loans to mortgage lenders, the purchase and sale of mortgage loans and the application of the proceeds thereof, including but not limited to rules and regulations relating to:

Housing, income or other reasonable eligibility standards for persons or families to be financed from mortgage loans purchased from mortgage lenders or from loans to mortgage lenders;

Limitations or restrictions as to the location or other qualifications or characteristics of residences to be financed from the proceeds of the purchases or loans;

Restrictions as to the interest rates on loans made from the proceeds of the purchase of mortgage loans or from loans to mortgage lenders or the return realized therefrom by mortgage lenders;

Requirements as to any commitments by mortgage lenders with respect to the application of the proceeds of the purchase or loan; and

Schedules of any fees and charges necessary to provide for expenses and reserves of the authority.

May adopt a program or issue bonds to purchase mortgage loans or make loans to mortgage lenders if the authority finds:

That the mortgage lending resources of the mortgage lenders are not sufficient to adequately finance the housing needs of the state; and

That the loan to lenders or mortgage loan purchased will promote better housing in the state.

May make, purchase from lenders, make commitments to purchase or take assignments from mortgage lenders of notes for home improvement loans, or make loans or commitments to lenders for the purpose of making funds available for home improvement loans. The home improvement loans to lenders shall be secured in a manner the authority determines;

Shall receive all funds which may be appropriated to it from the state treasury for the purpose of reducing the interest rate on mortgage loans made to low and moderate income persons. The authority shall allocate the lower interest rate mortgages only to persons and families of low and moderate income in need of assistance in obtaining decent, safe and sanitary housing at affordable rates;

Shall perform other duties consistent with its purpose as authorized by the legislature for the period prescribed by the legislature.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-832; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-107; Laws 1978, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, § 1; 1979, ch. 103, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 159, § 1; 1995, ch. 105, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 1; 2020, 1st Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

As to constitutionality of this section. —

See notes to §

9-7-105

.

The 2020 amendment,

added (a)(ix).

Laws 2020, 1st Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 7 makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved May 20, 2020.

Section supplements §

9-7-105

. —

Supplementing §

9-7-105

is this section, which to a considerable extent lays down detailed guidelines and restrictions upon the purchase of mortgages and loans to lenders. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and effect of statutes providing for urban redevelopment by private enterprise, 44 ALR2d 1414.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance providing for repair or destruction of residential building by public authorities at owner's expense, 43 ALR3d 916.

§ 9-7-107.
Community development authority; revenue bonds; issuance.

Subject to W.S.

9-7-108

, the authority may issue bonds in principal amounts the authority determines necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving any of its purposes, including the payment of interest, the establishment of reserves and for the purpose of defraying all other project and economic development project costs. All bonds issued under this act are negotiable instruments under the laws of the state unless expressly provided to the contrary on the face of the bonds.

All bonds issued by the authority are payable solely out of special funds consisting of all or part of its revenues, receipts, monies and assets, as designated in the proceedings under which the bonds are authorized. The bonds shall bear interest at the rates, be executed and delivered at times and in denominations, be of terms and maturities, be in bearer form or in registered form as to principal and interest or principal alone, and bear manual or facsimile signatures and seals as determined by the authority.

Bonds may be payable in installments and may bear maturities not exceeding forty-five (45) years from the date issued as determined by the authority.

As determined by the authority, bonds and interest may be payable at a time or place whether within or without the state. Bonds may contain other provisions not inconsistent with this act.

Any bonds issued by the authority may contain an option to redeem all or any part as may be specified. The price of redemption, the terms and conditions and the procedure of notice shall be set forth in the proceedings of the authority and may appear on the face of the bonds.

Any bonds of the authority may be sold at, above or below par value, at public or private sale, in a manner and from time to time as determined by the authority. The authority may pay legal fees, expenses, premiums and commissions which it finds necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale.

Additional bonds for a particular purpose may be issued provided the later issues shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made for any prior issue. Bonds may be issued providing that any later issues for the same project or economic development project may be on a parity with the earlier bonds.

The authority may provide for the issuance of its bonds to refund any bonds of the authority then outstanding, including the payment of any redemption premium and any interest or premium accrued or to accrue to, the earliest or subsequent date of redemption, purchase or maturity of the bonds and, if determined advisable by the authority, for the purpose of paying any part of the cost of acquiring, purchasing, constructing, reconstructing or improving any project or economic development project or for making any loan on any project or economic development project. Refunding shall be accomplished in the manner prescribed by W.S.

16-5-101

through

16-5-119

to the extent it is not inconsistent with this act.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-836; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-111; Laws 1978, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, § 1; 1979, ch. 103, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1984, ch. 43, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to issuance of bonds by state, see §

9-4-901

et seq.

As to legal rate of interest in absence of agreement or legal provision, see §

40-14-106

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

9-7-101

.

Revenue bonds deemed debts of state. —

Revenue bonds issued by the Wyoming community development authority, for the payment of which excise tax revenue to be derived in future years, is committed under the so-called “special” fund theory and comes within the debt limit prohibitions of art. 16, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978) (decided prior to 1978 amendment of this chapter).

§ 9-7-108.
Community development authority; revenue bonds; amount authorized.

through (c) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 64, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 87, § 3.

and (f) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 64, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 41, § 2.

In addition to the bonds presently outstanding, any bonds authorized for care facility projects, bonds that may be issued to refund bonds, and bonds the authority may issue from time to time as private activity bonds exempt from federal income taxation under section 146 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, the authority may issue and have outstanding additional bonds in an aggregate amount of up to four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000.00).

In addition to the bonds authorized by subsection (h) of this section, the authority may issue and have outstanding additional bonds for care facility projects in an aggregate amount of up to two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000.00).

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-837; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-112; Laws 1979, ch. 103, § 1; 1980, ch. 14, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1984, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 43, § 2; 1988, ch. 87, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 62, § 1; 1997, ch. 64, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 41, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 47, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 5, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Internal Revenue Code. —

Section 146 of the Internal Revenue Act of 1986 appears as 26 U.S.C. 146.

§ 9-7-109.
Community development authority; revenue bonds; security therefor.

The principal and interest on any bonds issued by the authority may be secured by a pledge of any revenues and receipts of the authority or assignment of mortgage loans or other assets purchased and may be secured by a mortgage or other instrument covering all or any part of a project or economic development project, including any additions, improvements, extensions to or enlargements of any project or economic development project later made, or assignment, pledge or any loan or loan participation.

Bonds issued for the purchase, acquisition, construction, reconstruction or improvement of a project or economic development project may also be secured by an assignment of any lease of or mortgage on the project or economic development project and by an assignment of the revenues and receipts derived by the authority from the lease or mortgage of the project or economic development project.

The resolution under which the bonds are authorized and any mortgage, lease or other instrument may contain agreements and provisions for the maintenance of the projects or economic development projects covered, the fixing and collection of rents or other revenues, including monies received in repayment of mortgage loans and interest, the creation and maintenance of special funds from rents or other revenues and the rights and remedies available in the event of default.

Each pledge, agreement, mortgage or other instrument made for the benefit or security of any bonds of the authority is valid and binding from the time when made. The revenues, receipts, monies and assets pledged are immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without delivery or further act. The lien is valid and binding against persons having claims of any kind against the authority whether or not the persons have actual notice of the lien. Neither the resolution nor the indenture or other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded or filed.

The authority may provide in the proceedings under which bonds are authorized that any part or all of any project or economic development project may be purchased, constructed, reconstructed or improved by the authority, any municipality or any lessee or designee of the authority, and may also provide for the time and manner of and requisites for disbursements to be made for the cost of construction and for all the certificates and approvals of construction and disbursements as the authority considers necessary.

Any resolution or trust indenture under which bonds of the authority are authorized may contain provisions for vesting in a trustee the properties, rights, powers and duties in trust as the authority determines. This may include any or all of the rights, powers and duties of the trustee appointed by the holders of any issue of bonds pursuant to W.S.

9-7-115

, in which event the provisions of W.S.

9-7-115

authorizing the appointment of a trustee by the holders of bonds shall not apply.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-838; W.S. 1977, § 9-18-113; Laws 1978, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, § 1; 1979, ch. 103, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1984, ch. 43, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to lien practice and procedure generally, see §

29-1-301

et seq.